Missouri, session 2026, HB2952.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 552, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 552.025, to read as follows:
552.025. 1. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of law, any person arrested and
subject to a mental health evaluation to determine whether the person is competent to
be tried, convicted, or sentenced in a criminal proceeding shall obtain such evaluation
within forty-five days from the date the person was arrested.
(2) If, based on the results of the mental health evaluation required under
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the person is to be transferred to a mental health
facility to receive treatment, such transfer shall occur within forty-five days after the
mental health evaluation.
2. If the evaluation or transfer required under subsection 1 of this section is not
completed within the forty-five-day time frame, the department of mental health or
other entity responsible for conducting the evaluation or transfer shall provide good
cause to the arresting authority or prosecuting attorney as to why the evaluation or
transfer was not completed within the time frame provided in subsection 1 of this
section.
3. On or before January 1, 2027, and every January first thereafter, the
department of mental health shall submit an annual report to the general assembly
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2952 2
summarizing the department's compliance with the provisions of subsection 1 of this
section for the previous year.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply if there:
(1) Are any medical emergencies preventing an evaluation under subdivision (1)
of subsection 1 of this section;
(2) Is no person able to conduct the evaluation required under subdivision (1) of
subsection 1 of this section; however, it shall be documented that efforts were made to
comply with the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section; or
(3) Are other justifiable delays that have been approved by the court, except that
no such delay shall exceed fifteen days.
✔